Massachusetts, session 194th, S3033.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The City of Boston, acting by and through its Parks and Recreation 
Commission may grant a highway easement to the City of Boston Department of Public Works 
for roadway purposes or permit the City of Boston Department of Public Works, acting by and 
through its Public Improvements Commission, the granting to or taking of a highway easement 
for roadway purposes, over a portion of that certain parcel designated as City of Boston 
Assessors' Parcel No. 0401966000, which is known commonly as Joslin Park (and which is 
bounded by Brookline Avenue, Joslin Place, Pilgrim Road and Deaconess Road), such portion 
measuring approximately 3,654 square feet, and which area is depicted as the "Highway 
Easement Area" on the certain plan of land entitled "1 Joslin Place, Brookline Avenue, Boston, 
Massachusetts Article 97 Change in Use Exhibit C-1", dated October 24, 2025, and prepared by 
VHB, Inc., which Plan is on file with the City of Boston Parks and Recreation Commission 

of 5 12 (hereinafter "Exhibit C-1"), to facilitate the construction of a new cancer hospital and associated 
site work and public benefits (including improvements to the adjacent Joslin Park), and, in 
connection therewith, authorize the temporary use of Joslin Park in connection with the 
construction of the roadway improvements contemplated by the granted highway easement, the 
construction of the reconfigured Joslin Park, and the construction of the new cancer hospital and 
related improvements on the abutting property at One Joslin Place, all of which is to be 
constructed by the owner of One Joslin Place and its air rights leasehold tenant.  
SECTION 2. As a condition of and consideration for said transfer or taking, and to ensure 
no net loss of land subject to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
Commonwealth, the City intends to (a) acting by and through its Public Improvements 
Commission, abandon its easement rights in and to that portion of Deaconess Road, a City of 
Boston public street, measuring approximately 1,516 square feet, which parcel of land is 
designated as "City Area to Park Area = 1,516 SF" on said Plan, (b) on behalf of its Public 
Improvements Commission, abandon its easement rights in and to that portion of Joslin Place, a 
City of Boston public street, measuring approximately 2,378 square feet, which parcel of land is 
designated as "City Area to Park Area = 2,378 SF" on said Plan, (c) on behalf of its Public 
Improvements Commission abandon its easement rights in and to two (2) portions of Joslin  
Place, City of Boston public street, measuring approximately 189 square feet in the aggregate, 
which parcels of land are designated as "Joslin Place Area to Park Area (Typ) - From Owner of 
Joslin Place" on said Plan, (d) on behalf of its Public Improvements Commission, abandon its 
easement rights in and to that portion of Joslin Place, a City of Boston public street, measuring 
approximately 920 square feet, which parcel of land is designated as "Shared Path Subject to 
Pedestrian and Maintenance Long-Term License or Other Legally Enforceable Means Area 920 

of 5 35 SF" on said Plan, and (e) following the City's abandonment of the aforementioned portions of 
Joslin Place, accept a deed from Joslin Diabetes Center, Inc., or the then owner of that certain 
parcel designated as City of Boston Assessors' Parcel No. 0401988001, which is known 
commonly as 415-435 Brookline Avenue, of those certain portions of the former Joslin Place, 
comprised of the areas referenced in clause (c) and the portion of the area in clause (d) owned by 
the owner of such parcel, and which conveyance shall (i) be to a depth of no less than 12 inches 
below the designed finished surface grade, including those changes contemplated in the "Article 
97 Change in Use Plan," prepared by VHB, Inc., dated October 24, 2025; and (ii) subject to 
customary license approval by the Parks Department, shall provide that the owner of the 415-435 
Brookline Avenue shall have the right, directly or through third party utility providers, to 
maintain, repair, replace, and reasonably relocate utilities, in the subsurface areas retained by 
such owner and such owner shall have the right, directly or through third party utility providers, 
to disturb the surface of the park land to maintain, repair and replace such utilities, from time to 
time, provided that the owner, and provided that the owner, or such third party utility provider, 
restore the surface above the utilities, including all paths, plantings and other park infrastructure  
disturbed by the installation; all of which land conveyed pursuant to clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) 
shall be held by the City of Boston under the care, custody, and control of the Parks and 
Recreation Commission, for public park and recreational purposes subject to said Article 97.  
SECTION 3. No document or instrument conveying or taking a highway easement in the 
approximately 3,654 square feet authorized in Section 1 shall be valid unless and until (i) the 
City of Boston Public Improvements Commission delivers an instrument abandoning the 
easement rights in and to the "City Area to Park Area = 1,516 SF", consisting of approximately 
1,516 square feet, the "City Area to Park Area = 2,378 SF”, consisting of approximately 2,378 

of 5 58 square feet, and the "Shared Path Subject to Pedestrian and Maintenance Long-Term License or 
Other Legally Enforceable Means Area 920 SF", consisting of approximately 920 square feet; 
and (ii) Joslin Diabetes Center, Inc., or the then owner of that certain parcel designated as City of 
Boston Assessors' Parcel No. 0401988001, which is known commonly as 415-435 Brookline 
Avenue, has delivered a deed to the City conveying the two (2) areas depicted on the Plan as 
"Joslin Place Area to Park Area (Typ) - from Joslin Place Owner", consisting of 189 square feet 
in the aggregate, and the portion of the area depicted as "Shared Path Subject to Pedestrian and 
Maintenance Long-Term License or Other Legally Enforceable Means Area 920 SF" owned by 
said owner of 415-435 Brookline Avenue, which deed shall be to a depth of no less than 12 
inches below the designed finished surface grade immediately following the completion of 
construction of the initial park improvements on such real estate, the fee ownership of such 
subsurface area shall be retained by the owner of the parcel identified as 415-435 Brookline 
Avenue above; all of which shall, upon abandonment of the existing roadways easements by the 
City of Boston, acting on behalf of its Public Improvements Commission, and upon transfer to 
the City of Boston by Joslin or the then owner, such parcels shall be held and maintained by the 
Parks and Recreation Commission solely for public park and recreational purposes, consistent  
with the provisions of Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth.  
SECTION 4. The square footages contained in Sections 1, 2 and 3 above, and reflected in 
Exhibit C-1 are approximate and are subject to final changes that may occur during permitting, 
approvals and actions by the City of Boston, including the Public Improvement Commission, 
with regard to the roadway reconfiguration and layout and the construction of the reconfigured 
roadway and reconfigured Joslin Park, and such revisions to the areas identified in Sections 1,2 
and 3 above, and reflected in Exhibit C-1, shall be authorized by this Act, provided, that, in no 

of 5 81 event shall the aggregate square footage of the land to be conveyed to the City of Boston Parks 
and Recreation Department for Article 97 identified in Section 2 and 3 above, and reflected in 
Exhibit C-1, be less than the square footage of the Highway Easement Area identified in Section 
1, as the same may be modified pursuant to this Section 4.  
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.